Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-8236
State Trauma Advisory Board; created; members; terms; expenses.

The State Trauma Advisory Board is created. The board shall be composed of representatives knowledgeable in emergency medical services and trauma care, including emergency medical providers such as physicians, nurses, hospital personnel, prehospital or emergency care providers, local government officials, state officials, consumers, and persons affiliated professionally with health science schools. The Director of Public Health or his or her designee shall appoint the members of the board for staggered terms of three years each. The department shall provide administrative support to the board. All members of the board may be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. The terms of members representing the same field shall not expire at the same time.

The board shall elect a chairperson and a vice-chairperson whose terms of office shall be for two years. The board shall meet at least twice per year by written request of the director or the chairperson.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 36;

Laws 1998, LB 898, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 64;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 691;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 73;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 51;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 107.